apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="bass__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>es'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bus__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ses</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>es'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ses'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="politics__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>'s</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="wol/f__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>f</l>
        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ves</l>
        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ves'</l>
        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>fs</l>
        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="li/fe__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>fe</l>
        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ves</l>
        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ves'</l>
        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="p/erson__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>erson</l>
        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eople</l>
        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ersons</l>
        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ephemeri/s__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>des</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>des'</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cyclop/s__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ses</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="staff__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>'s</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>s'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="child__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ren</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/ouse__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ouse</l>
        <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ice</l>
        <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/oot__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>oot</l>
        <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eet</l>
        <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>oot</l>
        <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="br/other__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>other</l>
        <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ethren</l>
        <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>others</l>
        <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="stimul/us__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>us</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>us</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="larva__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ind/ex__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ex</l>
        <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>exes</l>
        <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ices</l>
        <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="person of action" i=""><i>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/><p><l><b/>of<b/>action</l><r><g><b/>of<b/>action</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="Kyrgyz" i=""><i>Kyrgyz</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="annex" i=""><i>ann</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="brother" i=""><i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="bus" i=""><i>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="child" i=""><i>child</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="person, people" i=""><i>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="complex" i=""><i>compl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
                            <e r="LR" i=""><i>craft</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="foot" i=""><i>f</i><par n="f/oot__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="fish" i=""><i>fish</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="genius" i=""><i>geni</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="grandchild" i=""><i>grandchild</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="vertex" i=""><i>vert</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="insignia" i=""><i>insignia</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="knife" i=""><i>kni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="life" i=""><i>li</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="mouse" i=""><i>m</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="midwife" i=""><i>midwi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="pediatrics" i=""><i>pediatrics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="shelf" i=""><i>shel</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="staff" i=""><i>staff</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="stimulus" i=""><i>stimul</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="handkerchief" i=""><i>handkerchie</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="tuna" i=""><i>tuna</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="vagina" i=""><i>vagina</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="wife" i=""><i>wi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="bonus" i=""><i>bonus</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="apex" i=""><i>ap</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="chemometrics" i=""><i>chemometrics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="decidua" i=""><i>decidua</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="narthex" i=""><i>narth</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="petechia" i=""><i>petechia</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="taenia" i=""><i>taenia</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="urethra" i=""><i>urethra</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="werewolf" i=""><i>werewol</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="marquess" i=""><i>marquess</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="jellyfish" i=""><i>jellyfish</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="dwarf" i=""><i>dwar</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="ramen" i=""><i>ramen</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="penknife" i=""><i>penkni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="salmon" i=""><i>salmon</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="dormouse" i=""><i>dorm</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="tectonics" i=""><i>tectonics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="radius" i=""><i>radi</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="ephemeris" i=""><i>ephemeri</i><par n="ephemeri/s__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="assiduousness" i=""><i>assiduousness</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="elf" i=""><i>el</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
